District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.27

Failure to determine eligibility within time requirement.

The Mayor shall not terminate his consideration of an application for assistance solely because he has been unable to establish the eligibility of the applicant within the 45- or 60-day period.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 527, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.27.